District of Columbia statutes.
7-1613

Purpose.

(a)

The initiative shall provide technical and financial assistance to selected community HIV/AIDS service providers located east of the Anacostia river to support the:

(1)

Implementation or expansion of HIV/AIDS prevention and support programs;

(2)

Development of accurate performance measurement capabilities; and

(3)

Promotion of revenue diversity.

(b)

Assistance to selected community HIV/AIDS service providers shall be provided for up to 2 years.

Mar. 20, 2008, D.C. Law 17-117, § 4, 55 DCR 1282
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 5021(a), 57 DCR 181
D.C. Law 18-111 rewrote the section, which had read as follows: “The initiative shall provide technical and financial assistance to selected community HIV/AIDS service providers as part of a 2-year program designed to build operational capacities, improve HIV/AIDS service delivery, enable accurate performance measurement, and increase revenue diversity.”
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 5021(a) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 5021(a) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).
Short title: Section 5020 of D.C. Law 18-111 provided that subtitle C of title V of the act may be cited as the “Effi Slaughter Barry HIV/AIDS Initiative Amendment Act of 2009”.